Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5054.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 37 of the General Laws entitled "PUBLIC PROPERTY AND WORKS"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 27
MAINTENANCE OF PUBLIC BUILDINGS
37-27-1. Maintenance of state and municipal buildings.
All state and municipal buildings, constructed and occupied after January 1, 2026, shall be
responsible for budgeting, on a yearly basis for its building maintenance expenses, at least five-
tenths percent (0.5%) of the total construction cost of the building.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000302
========